Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB448.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 17 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Criminal history records information":
1. Means information collected by criminal justice agencies on individuals consisting of
identifiable descriptions and notations of arrests, indictments, information, or other formal
criminal charges, and any disposition arising therefrom, including sentencing, correction
supervision, and release;
2. Includes information that is sealed pursuant to court order or other law if the records are
accessible by criminal justice agencies for the purpose of conducting background checks; and
3. Does not include identification information such as fingerprint records to the extent that the
information does not indicate involvement of the individual in the criminal justice system;
(b) "Criminal justice agency" means:
1. The Kentucky Court of Justice;
2. The Department of Kentucky State Police;
3. Sheriffs;
4. State and local correctional facilities;
5. City, county, urban-county government, charter county government, consolidated local
government, and unified local government police departments;
6. School resource officer departments;
7. Airport safety and security departments;
8. Any agency or department that employs a state officer, listed in KRS 15.420(2)(a)2.; and
9. Any other state or local agency in the Commonwealth of Kentucky that performs the
administration of criminal justice pursuant to a statute, executive order, or other law, and
which allocates a majority of its annual budget to the administration of criminal justice; and
(c) "Requesting agency" means:
1. The United States Department of Defense;
2. The United States Department of State;
3. The United States Department of Transportation;
4. The United States Office of Personnel Management;
5. The Central Intelligence Agency;
6. The Federal Bureau of Investigation;
7. The United States Department of Homeland Security;
8. The Office of the Director of National Intelligence;
9. An executive agency of the United States that is:
a. Authorized to conduct background investigations under a federal statute; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
b. Delegated authority to conduct background investigations in accordance with
procedures established by a security executive agent or a suitability executive agent
under subsection (b) or (c)(iv) of Section 2.3 of Executive Order 13467, 73 Fed. Reg.
38103, or any successor thereto; or
10. A contractor that conducts a background investigation on behalf of an entity listed in
subparagraphs 1. to 9. in this paragraph.
(2) A criminal justice agency shall provide criminal history records information to a requesting agency when
that requesting agency is conducting a basic suitability or fitness assessment for federal or contractor
employees under 5 U.S.C. sec. 9101 and requests that information from the criminal justice agency.
(3) A criminal justice agency may request a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) to be paid by the requesting agency
for reimbursement of expenses related to providing criminal history records information. Under no
circumstances shall an agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky be responsible for paying this fee.
Section 2. KRS 610.340 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Unless a specific provision of KRS Chapters 600 to 645 specifies otherwise, all juvenile court records
of any nature generated pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 by any agency or instrumentality, public
or private, shall be deemed to be confidential and shall not be disclosed except to the child, parent,
victims, or other persons authorized to attend a juvenile court hearing pursuant to KRS 610.070 unless
ordered by the court for good cause.
(b) Juvenile court records which contain information pertaining to arrests, petitions, adjudications, and
dispositions of a child may be disclosed to victims or other persons authorized to attend a juvenile court
hearing pursuant to KRS 610.070.
(c) Release of the child's treatment, medical, mental, or psychological records is prohibited unless
presented as evidence in Circuit Court. Any records resulting from the child's prior abuse and neglect
under Title IV-E or Title IV-B of the Federal Social Security Act shall not be disclosed to victims or
other persons authorized to attend a juvenile court hearing pursuant to KRS 610.070.
(d) Victim access under this subsection to juvenile court records shall include access to records of
adjudications that occurred prior to July 15, 1998.
(2) The provisions of this section shall not apply to public officers or employees engaged in the investigation of
and in the prosecution of cases under KRS Chapters 600 to 645 or other portions of the Kentucky Revised
Statutes. Any record obtained pursuant to this subsection shall be used for official use only, shall not be
disclosed publicly, and shall be exempt from disclosure under the Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(3) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any peace officer, as defined in KRS 446.010, who is engaged
in the investigation or prosecution of cases under KRS Chapters 600 to 645 or other portions of the Kentucky
Revised Statutes. Any record obtained pursuant to this subsection shall be used for official use only, shall not
be disclosed publicly, and shall be exempt from disclosure under the Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to
61.884.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not apply to employees of the Department of Juvenile Justice or cabinet or
its designees responsible for any services under KRS Chapters 600 to 645 or to attorneys for parties involved
in actions relating to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 or other prosecutions authorized by the Kentucky Revised
Statutes.
(5) The provisions of this section shall not apply to records disclosed pursuant to KRS 610.320 or to public or
private elementary and secondary school administrative, transportation, and counseling personnel, to any
teacher or school employee with whom the student may come in contact, or to persons entitled to have juvenile
records under KRS 610.345, if the possession and use of the records is in compliance with the provisions of
KRS 610.345 and this section.
(6) The provisions of this section shall not apply to employees of local law enforcement agencies, the Department
of Kentucky State Police, or the Federal Bureau of Investigation engaged in conducting background checks for
the sole purpose of identifying and providing potentially disqualifying juvenile public offense records to the
National Instant Criminal Background Check System pursuant to Div. A, Title II, Sec. 12001(a) of the
Bipartisan Safer Communities Act, Pub. L. No. 117-159. Notwithstanding KRS 635.040, an adjudication for a
public offense is a conviction of a crime for purposes of 18 U.S.C. sec. 922(d)(1), (3), or (9). Any public

CHAPTER 42 3
offense record obtained pursuant to this subsection shall be used for official use only, not be disclosed
publicly, and be exempt from disclosure under the Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(7) The provisions of this section shall not apply to criminal justice agencies conducting a basic suitability or
fitness assessment for federal or contractor employees under 5 U.S.C. sec. 9101 in accordance with Section
1 of this Act.
(8) (a) The provisions of this section shall not apply to records or proceedings in any case in which a child has
made an admission to or been adjudicated for a violent felony offense as defined in KRS 532.200 until
the expiration of a three (3) year period from the date of admission or adjudication.
(b) If the child has not received any additional public offense convictions during the three (3) year period
from the date of admission or adjudication, all records in the case shall be automatically sealed and
shall not be disclosed consistent with the provisions of this section.
(c) As used in this subsection, "admission" means a formal admission in a case, on the record, upon the
waiving of an adjudication hearing.
(9)[(8)] A[No] person, including school personnel, shall not disclose any confidential record or any information
contained therein except as permitted by this section or other specific section of KRS Chapters 600 to 645, or
except as permitted by specific order of the court.
(10)[(9)] A[No] person, including school personnel, authorized to obtain records pursuant to KRS Chapters 600
to 645 shall not obtain or attempt to obtain confidential records to which he or she is not entitled or for
purposes for which he or she is not permitted to obtain them pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645.
(11)[(10)] A[No] person, including school personnel, not authorized to obtain records pursuant to KRS Chapters
600 to 645 shall not obtain or attempt to obtain records which are made confidential pursuant to KRS Chapters
600 to 645 except upon proper motion to a court of competent jurisdiction.
(12)[(11)] A[No] person shall not destroy or attempt to destroy any record required to be kept pursuant to KRS
Chapters 600 to 645 unless the destruction is permitted pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 and is authorized
by the court upon proper motion and good cause for the destruction being shown.
(13)[(12)] As used in this section the term "KRS Chapters 600 to 645" includes any administrative regulations
which are lawfully promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645.
(14)[(13)] Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a crime victim from speaking publicly after the
adjudication about his or her case on matters within his or her knowledge or on matters disclosed to the victim
during any aspect of a juvenile court proceeding.
Signed by Governor April 7, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version